Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1231
Number other than number awarded attached to bow; prohibited.

No number other than the number awarded to a vessel or granted reciprocity pursuant to the State Boat Act shall be attached on either side of the bow of such vessel.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 31;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 116.